Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Personnel Training

199.900.
Training programs authorized — Research assignment — Classification — Compensation — Contract.

The secretary for health and family services in coordination with the Personnel Cabinet is authorized to establish formal training programs within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or within any of the divisions or sections of the cabinet for the training of necessary personnel for the administration of the programs of the cabinet. When courses of study, applicable to the program processes of the cabinet, are not available through cabinet instruction, arrangements may be made for the training of employees in any public or private school or institution having available facilities for that purpose, and such training shall be deemed to be a part of the cabinet training program. Training of employees in public or private schools or institutions for this purpose shall be deemed a part of research assignments to be completed during the period of study, and these assignments are to relate directly to the work assignment of the employee. After consulting with the Personnel Cabinet, position classifications in the research series shall be established for employees on such work study assignments, and funds of the cabinet may be used to pay salaries commensurate with the appropriate classification while the employee is receiving training.

Any employee who is paid a salary while receiving such training shall be required to enter into a contract, prior to receiving the training, that he will complete a specified work assignment, and that unless he continues in the employ of the cabinet for at least a period equivalent to the training period, immediately following the completion of training, the state will hold a claim against him for the amount of salary paid during the training period, and he will repay to the cabinet the sum paid to him by the cabinet during the period of his training.

History.
Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 85, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(1), (13) and (30); 1998, ch. 154, § 86, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 164, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 200, effective June 20, 2005.